Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

33-6-101. Powers and duties of officers.

Every Colorado wildlife officer or other commissioned officer of the division shall enforce the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title. Every other peace officer, as defined in section 33-1-102 (32), may assist the Colorado wildlife officers in the enforcement of articles 1 to 6 of this title. Each such officer has the full power and authority to arrest any person who he or she has probable cause to believe is guilty of a violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title, and, in accordance with the constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of Colorado, to open, enter, and search all places of concealment where he or she has probable cause to believe wildlife held in violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title is to be found or where other material evidence relating to a violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title is to be found and to seize the same. Each such officer shall have the authority to secure and execute search or arrest warrants.

Any peace officer, as defined in section 33-1-102 (32), empowered with enforcing the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title has the authority to go onto any lands or waters, public or private, to demand of any person, who he has reason to believe has exercised the benefits conferred by any license provided for in articles 1 to 6 of this title, the immediate production of such license and any wildlife in possession; and such peace officer shall have the right and opportunity to inspect such licenses and wildlife.

When protection of the public health, safety, or welfare requires, any officer having the power to enforce the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title shall have the authority to make use of any motor vehicle or other means of transportation, whether privately or publicly owned, to aid him in the performance of his duties. Payment of reasonable compensation shall be made for the use of such motor vehicle or other means of transportation.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 865, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 96:

(4) added, p. 1351, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 841, § 4, effective May 30.

L. 2003:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1630, § 68, effective August 6; (4) repealed, p. 1954, § 49, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-101 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-102. Items constituting public nuisance - when - seizure.

Every motor vehicle, vessel, firearm, seine, net, trap, explosive, poisonous or stupefying substance, or other personal property used in the hunting, taking, or harassing of wildlife in violation of the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title is declared to be a public nuisance. Every such item shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and forfeiture or destruction as provided in this section, unless the possession of said property is not unlawful and the owner of said property was not a party to the violation and would suffer undue hardship by the sale, confiscation, or destruction of the property.

Any personal property subject to seizure, confiscation, and forfeiture or destruction under the provisions of this section, which is seized as a part of or incident to a criminal proceeding for violation of the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title and for which disposition is not provided by another statute of this state, shall be disposed of as provided in this section.

The division shall be in violation of this section if it seizes any personal property that is not part of or incident to a criminal proceeding for violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title and does not return such property on demand.

If the division violates subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) or any other provision of law when seizing personal property, the division shall be charged one hundred dollars per day per violation plus any attorney's fees incurred by the owner of the property.

Any such property, the possession of which is illegal and which in the opinion of the court having jurisdiction over the criminal proceeding is not properly the subject of a sale, may be destroyed pursuant to a warrant for the destruction of personal property issued by the court and directed to the division. The court shall stay the execution of any such warrant during the period in which the property is used as evidence in any pending criminal or civil proceeding.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the court may order any such property sold by the division in the manner provided for sales on execution. The proceeds of the sale shall be applied as follows:

To the fees and costs of removal and sale;

To the payment of the state's costs on such action; and

The balance, if any, or any portion thereof not otherwise distributed pursuant to this paragraph (c), to the wildlife cash fund. Instead of being deposited in the wildlife cash fund, such balance or any portion thereof may be transmitted, upon order of the court, as follows:

To the seizing agency, if the court finds that the proceeds can be used by such agency;

To any person who suffers bodily injury or property damage as a result of the action which constitutes the violation, if said person petitions the court therefor.

In lieu of ordering the sale or destruction of such property, the court may, if it finds that it can be used by the agency which seized it, order it delivered to the agency for such use.

The division shall not undertake any seizure of property pursuant to this section unless the division has complied with parts 3 and 5 of article 13 of title 16, C.R.S., as applicable.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 865, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1580, § 7, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2) amended and (6) added, p. 375, §§ 3, 2, effective April 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-137 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For abatement of public nuisances, see part 3 of article 13 of title 16.

33-6-103. Prosecution of offenses.

If the possession, use, importation, exportation, transportation, storage, sale, or offering or exposing for sale of wildlife is prohibited or restricted by articles 1 to 6 of this title or by rule or regulation of the commission, the prohibition or restriction, where not otherwise specifically provided, shall extend to and include every part of such wildlife, and a violation as to each animal or part thereof shall be a separate offense. Two or more offenses may be charged in the same complaint, information, or indictment, and proof as to part of an animal shall be sufficient to sustain a charge as to the whole of it. Violations as to any number of animals of the same kind may be charged in the same count and punished as a separate offense as to each animal.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 866, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-130 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-104. Imposition of penalty - procedures.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars, a surcharge as described in section 24-33.5-415.6, and an assessment of five license suspension points for a violation of any of the following for which there is not an associated statutory penalty listed:

A provision of articles 1 to 6 of this title 33; or

A rule of the commission promulgated pursuant to one or more of the articles specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

At the time that a person is charged with violating any misdemeanor or civil infraction provision of articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 or a rule of the commission, the officer shall issue a summons and complaint to the alleged offender or, in the case of a violation for which a fine of a fixed amount is prescribed, may give the alleged offender an opportunity to voluntarily pay the fine and surcharge in the form of a penalty assessment.
(2) (a) (I) At the time that a person is charged with violating any misdemeanor or civil infraction provision of articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 or a rule of the commission, the officer shall issue a summons and complaint to the alleged offender or, in the case of a violation for which a fine of a fixed amount is prescribed, may give the alleged offender an opportunity to voluntarily pay the fine and surcharge in the form of a penalty assessment.

An officer shall not issue a penalty assessment for violations for which minimum and maximum fines have been established. The penalty assessment notice given to the alleged offender must:

Contain the information required for a summons and complaint;

Be in the form of a summons and complaint; and

Specify in dollars the amount of the penalty to be assessed for the alleged offense and the amount of the surcharges to be collected pursuant to sections 24-4.2-104 (1) and 24-33.5-415.6.

If the alleged offender accepts the penalty assessment notice and pays the fine and the surcharges entered on the fine to the division within twenty days of issuance of the notice, the alleged offender's acceptance and payment constitutes an acknowledgment of guilt of the violation set forth in the penalty assessment notice.

An officer may take any person who accepts a penalty assessment notice but who does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity or who the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe will disregard a written promise to pay the specified fine and surcharges to the nearest known post office facility to require that the person remit the amount of the specified fine and surcharges to the division immediately by mail in United States currency or other legal tender or by money order or by personal check.

Refusal or inability to remit the specified fine and surcharges by mail when required constitutes a refusal to accept a penalty assessment notice. The officer shall advise the person arrested of the license suspension points to be assessed in accordance with section 33-6-106.

Checks tendered by the violator to and accepted by the division and for which payment is received by the division are deemed sufficient receipt. If the fine and surcharges are not paid, then the officer who issued the penalty assessment notice shall docket the summons and complaint with a court of competent jurisdiction for appearance by the person to answer the charges contained in the summons and complaint at the time and place specified in the summons and complaint.

Service of a copy of a summons and complaint or penalty assessment notice issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section must be provided at least ten days before the date set for a hearing on the matter by:

(I) Providing personal service of the copy directly to the alleged offender;

(II) Leaving the copy at the alleged offender's last-known place of residence with an individual who is eighteen years of age or older and who resides at the residence; or

(III) Mailing the copy to the alleged offender's last-known place of residence by certified mail, return receipt requested. Service by certified mail is complete upon return of the receipt signed by the alleged offender.

An individual who provides personal service pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section must be a disinterested party who is eighteen years of age or older.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 866, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 796, § 4, effective May 3.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-241), ch. 295, p. 1580, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3693, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 168, § 4, effective March 20.

L. 2022:

(2)(a)(I) amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 347, § 33, effective March 1.

33-6-105. Disposition of fines and surcharges.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, all money collected for fines under articles 1 to 6 of this title 33, either by payment of a penalty assessment or assessed by a court upon conviction and resulting from issuance of a citation by an officer of the division of parks and wildlife, shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the wildlife cash fund or, for offenses involving nongame wildlife, to the Colorado nongame conservation and wildlife restoration cash fund.

When an arrest has been made or the citation for any wildlife offense has been issued by any other Colorado peace officer, as defined in this title 33, the state treasurer shall credit one-half of the money collected to the wildlife cash fund or, for offenses involving nongame wildlife, to the Colorado nongame conservation and wildlife restoration cash fund, and:

If the peace officer is employed by a local jurisdiction, one-half to the treasurer of the Colorado town, city, county, or city and county in which the violation occurred, to be credited to the appropriate fund; or

If the peace officer is employed by another state agency, one-half to a fund administered by the state agency whose officer issued the citation, as designated by the state agency.

It is the duty of every clerk of a court before which prosecutions and appeals of violators of articles 1 to 6 of this title are heard, within twenty days after any such trial, appeal, disposition, or dismissal thereof, to notify the division, in writing, of the result thereof and the amount of fines collected, if any, and the disposition of such fines.

The provisions of the "Colorado Crime Victim Compensation Act", article 4.1 of title 24, C.R.S., shall not apply to articles 1 to 6 of this title, and the costs imposed by said act shall not be levied on criminal actions for violations of articles 1 to 6 of this title.

No fine, penalty, or judgment assessed or rendered under the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title shall be suspended, reduced, or remitted otherwise than as expressly provided by law.

All moneys collected by the division as surcharges on penalty assessments issued pursuant to section 33-6-104 shall be transmitted to the court administrator of the judicial district in which the offense was committed for credit to the victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund established in that judicial district.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 867, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(5) added, p. 797, § 5, effective May 3.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1739, § 5, effective April 3.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1581, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1390, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1250), ch. 362, p. 1899, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3693, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 33-6-132 and 33-6-133 as they existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

(1) For the wildlife cash fund, see § 33-1-112; for the nongame conservation and wildlife restoration cash fund, see § 33-1-125.

(2) For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-106. Suspension of license privileges.

The commission, or a hearing officer who has been delegated authority by the commission, has the exclusive authority to suspend the privilege of applying for, purchasing, or exercising the benefits conferred by any or all licenses issued by the division for a period not to exceed five years, except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title, if a person:

Has been convicted of violations of articles 1 to 6 of this title totaling twenty or more points in any consecutive five-year period;

While a Colorado resident:

Has been convicted of wildlife violations of another state, or any Canadian province, United States territory, or federal agency which is a member of the "Wildlife Violator Compact", part 26 of article 60 of title 24, C.R.S., for which equivalent charges exist in this state, and such convictions, individually or when combined with convictions specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), would total twenty or more points in any consecutive five-year period.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1940, § 4, effective May 22, 2003.)

Has been convicted of any violation of title 18, C.R.S., that was committed while hunting, trapping, fishing, or engaging in a related activity or of any federal wildlife violations within Colorado and such federal convictions, individually or when combined with convictions specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), total twenty or more points;

Is found to meet the requirements for reciprocal suspension as provided in the "Wildlife Violator Compact", part 26 of article 60 of title 24, C.R.S.;

Has been convicted of any violation under section

33-6-114.5 (2)

, (3), (4), (5), or (6).

(1.3) (a) The commission or a hearing officer that the commission delegates to hear a matter may suspend a person's license in accordance with subsection (1) of this section if the person fails to comply with the terms of a summons, complaint, summons and complaint, penalty assessment notice, or other official notice of an alleged violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 issued by a Colorado wildlife officer, parks officer, or other peace officer.

A suspension issued pursuant to this subsection (1.3) remains in effect until the person furnishes or causes to be furnished satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the summons, complaint, summons and complaint, penalty assessment notice, or other official notice of an alleged violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title 33. The division shall enter the suspension in accordance with article III of the "Wildlife Violator Compact", part 26 of article 60 of title 24, and shall remove the entry upon satisfactory evidence of the person's compliance with an official notice of an alleged violation.

For the purposes of license suspension under subsection (1) of this section, the payment of a penalty assessment, a court conviction, a plea of nolo contendere, the acceptance of a deferred or suspended sentence by the court, the adjudication of a juvenile as delinquent for any violation of this title that would have resulted in a conviction if prosecuted as an adult, or forfeiture of bail shall be deemed a conviction.

Any person who is to be considered for suspension, including permanent suspension, shall be given due notice of such action and shall be given the opportunity to appear and show cause why his or her license privileges should not be suspended. Such notice shall be in the form of a certified letter, return receipt requested, sent to the last-known address of the person, stating the violations and the date of hearing. Proof of such mailing and attempted delivery shall be sufficient proof of the notice required by this subsection (3).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4.5) of this section, any hearing on the suspension of license privileges for Colorado residents shall be held in a regional or area office of the division nearest to the residence of the respondent or, in the case of nonresidents, in such other location as may be determined by the division. Such hearing shall be conducted by a hearing examiner on behalf of the commission. The hearing examiner may administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers, and apply to the district court for enforcement thereof. The hearing examiner shall not be subject to the provisions of part 10 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S. The director shall appoint such hearing examiners, who may be employees of the division.

(4.5) With respect to any suspension of the license of a resident pursuant to the provisions of a compact with another state, territory, or province for failure to comply with the terms of a summons, complaint, summons and complaint, penalty assessment notice, or other official notice of an alleged wildlife violation issued by a wildlife officer or other authorized peace officer in such other state, territory, or province, the hearing shall be conducted by the commission at the time and place of a regularly scheduled meeting without the need for any prior hearing by the hearing examiner. The commission shall have the authority with respect to any such suspension to suspend the resident's privileges until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the summons, complaint, summons and complaint, penalty assessment notice, or other official notice of violation has been furnished to the division.

Notice of any resulting suspension shall be sent to the person by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last-known address of such person and to license agents and other persons who should be notified of such suspensions.

Any person whose license privileges have been suspended shall not be entitled to purchase, apply for, or exercise the benefits conferred by any license issued by the division until such person's suspension has expired. Any person who violates this subsection (6) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars. Conviction under this subsection (6) shall result in an automatic two-year extension of the existing suspension added to the end of the original suspension unless such person was under a lifetime suspension when such violation occurred. If a person is under a lifetime suspension and violates this subsection (6), such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The commission may delegate the exercise of its exclusive authority to suspend wildlife license privileges to any hearing examiner appointed by the division. The hearing examiner's decision may be appealed to the commission by filing a notice of appeal with the commission within thirty days after receipt of the hearing examiner's decision.

If a person's privilege of applying for, purchasing, or exercising the benefits conferred by any or all licenses issued by the division is suspended three or more times pursuant to this section, such person shall receive a lifetime suspension of such privileges.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 868, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 89:

(1)(d) and (4.5) added and (4) amended, p. 1092, §§ 2, 3, effective April 12.

L. 90:

(1)(e) added, p. 1531, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(d), (3), (4), and (5) amended and (7) added, pp. 1581, 1582, §§ 9, 10, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(b)(II), (1)(c), (2), and (6) amended and (8) added, p. 1940, § 4, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(9) added, (HB 12-1330), ch. 259, p. 1336, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(1.3) added, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 169, § 5, effective March 20.

33-6-107. Licensing violations - penalties - rule.

Except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 or by rule of the commission, a person shall not procure or use more than one license of a certain type in a calendar year. A person who violates this subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall, with respect to wildlife other than big game, be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points or shall, with respect to big game, be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points.

A license procured in violation of this subsection (1) is void.

Any person who makes a false statement or provides false information in connection with applying for or purchasing a license, or any license agent who knowingly uses or accepts false information in connection with selling or issuing a license, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by the following fines:

For each license that is not a big game license, a fine that is equal to twice the cost of the most expensive license for such species and ten license suspension points shall be assessed.

For each big game license, a fine that is equal to twice the cost of the most expensive license for such species and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points shall be assessed.

All licenses obtained with false information are void.

Except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title or by rule of the commission, any person, regardless of age, who hunts or takes wildlife in this state shall procure a proper and valid license therefor and shall have the valid license on his or her person when exercising the benefits it confers. A person who violates this subsection (3) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine and an assessment of license suspension points as follows:

For each license that is not a big game license, the fine shall be equal to twice the cost of the most expensive license for such species and ten license suspension points shall be assessed.

For each big game license, fifteen license suspension points and a fine that is equal to twice the cost of the most expensive license for such species shall be assessed.

(3.5) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, it is unlawful for any person under sixteen years of age to hunt wildlife with a youth license issued pursuant to section 33-4-102 (1.4)(x) unless such person is at all times personally accompanied by, and in voice and reasonable visual contact with, a person eighteen years of age or older who holds a valid hunter education certificate or who was born before January 1, 1949. Any person who violates this subsection (3.5) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars and is assessed five license suspension points.

It is unlawful for any person under twelve years of age to hunt or take big game, and it is unlawful for persons between the ages of twelve and fifteen years of age to hunt or take big game except when at all times personally accompanied by, and in voice and reasonable visual contact with, a person eighteen years of age or older who holds a valid hunter education certificate or who was born before January 1, 1949. Any person who violates this subsection (4) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars and is assessed ten license suspension points.

Any person who possesses live wildlife in this state and who is required by commission rule to have a license for possession of live wildlife shall have the required license at the site where the wildlife is kept. Any person who violates this subsection (5) commits a petty offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and is assessed ten license suspension points.

A person sixteen years of age or older who fishes for or takes fish, amphibians, mollusks, or crustaceans in this state shall have a proper and valid fishing license on his or her person. Persons under sixteen years of age are not required to have a fishing license and are entitled to the full bag or possession limit set by the commission. A person who violates this subsection (6) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

It is unlawful to alter, transfer, sell, loan, or assign a lawfully acquired license to another person, or to use another person's lawfully acquired license. A person who violates this subsection (7) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points, and licenses so used are void.

Unless otherwise permitted by commission rule, it is unlawful for any person born on or after January 1, 1949, to purchase or obtain any hunting license, hunt, or trap unless the person has been issued a hunter education certificate by the division, attesting to the person's successful completion of a division-certified hunter education course taught by a division-certified instructor or equivalent education and training recognized by the division under paragraph (b), (c), or (e) of this subsection (8) or subsection (10) of this section.

In order to increase hunter recruitment and retention, the commission may promulgate a rule establishing alternative requirements to obtain a certificate of hunter education. The alternatives may include: Options to demonstrate knowledge of hunting, safety, and ethics; course delivery options; completion of a hunter education course, including any required hands-on activities, offered pursuant to section 22-1-134; issuing temporary or apprentice certificates of hunter education; and an option to test out of the hunter education course.

The commission shall promulgate a rule allowing veterans, including active-duty, reserve-duty, or national guard personnel, to obtain a hunter education certificate without attending a hunter education course if the veteran successfully passes a test-out option as developed by the commission. To qualify, a veteran must be discharged under honorable conditions or be a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section 28-5-100.3.

Unless the certificate of hunter education has been verified by the division, any person required to obtain a certificate of hunter education shall have the certificate on his or her person while hunting, trapping, or taking wildlife.

For the purposes of this subsection (8), the division shall recognize, in addition to Colorado hunter education certificates issued on or after January 1, 1985, those Colorado hunter education certificates issued before January 1, 1985, and any valid temporary hunter education certificate issued by the division, and the division may recognize the hunter education programs of or certificates of other states or countries as being sufficient for the purposes of purchasing a hunting license in Colorado.

Any person who violates this subsection (8) or any rule implementing this subsection (8) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

For the purposes of this section, any person, any member of such person's family, or any employee of the person may hunt, trap, or take black-billed magpies, common crows, starlings, English or house sparrows, common pigeons, coyotes, bobcats, red foxes, raccoons, jackrabbits, badgers, marmots, prairie dogs, pocket gophers, Richardson's ground squirrels, rock squirrels, thirteen-lined ground squirrels, porcupines, crayfish, tiger salamanders, muskrats, beavers, exotic wildlife, and common snapping turtles on lands owned or leased by the person without securing licenses to do so, but only when such wildlife is causing damage to crops, real or personal property, or livestock. Any person may kill skunks or rattlesnakes when necessary to protect life or property. The pelts or hides of any mammals taken under this subsection (9) may be transferred, possessed, traded, bartered, or sold by a person who holds an appropriate small game license.

The division may issue an apprentice certificate of hunter education to a person who:

Is at least ten years of age;

Is being taught to hunt by a mentor who is eighteen years of age or older and who holds a valid hunter education certificate or who was born before January 1, 1949; and

Complies with any requirements established by rule of the commission.

While hunting, a person issued an apprentice certificate of hunter education shall be personally accompanied by, in voice contact with, and in visual contact with a mentor who is eighteen years of age or older and who holds a valid hunter education certificate or who was born before January 1, 1949.

An apprentice certificate of hunter education:

May be used in lieu of a certificate of hunter education issued under subsection (8) of this section to purchase or obtain a license to take wildlife; and

Is valid for no more than one year after issuance.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 868, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 89:

(8) and (9) amended, p. 1346, § 6, effective April 27.

L. 94:

(3.5) added and (4) and (6) amended, p. 1221, § 4, effective May 22; (3), (4), (7), (8), and (9) amended, p. 1582, § 11, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 1111, § 67, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1941, § 5, effective May 22; (1), (6), (7), and (9) amended, pp. 1028, 1032, §§ 2, 9, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(8) amended and (10) added, (SB 15-226), ch. 220, p. 808, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(1)(a), (5), (6), and (8)(f) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3693, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(8)(c) amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 177, § 15, effective November 11; (3.5), (4), and (5) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3259, § 551, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(8)(b) amended, (HB 22-1168), ch. 115, p. 540, § 2, effective August 10.

33-6-108. Possession as prima facie evidence.

The possession of wildlife shall be prima facie evidence that the person having such possession is engaged or has been engaged in hunting, fishing, or trapping.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 870, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-136 as it existed prior to 1984.